California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(c) If the term of an ombudsperson expires without the appointment of a successor under this chapter, the incumbent ombudsperson may continue in office until a successor is appointed.
 If the ombudsperson dies, resigns, becomes ineligible to serve, or is removed or suspended from office, the director shall designate an acting ombudsperson until the ombudsperson is appointed. The director shall appoint a new ombudsperson pursuant to this section within a reasonable period from the date the office became vacant. The acting ombudsperson shall not remain in office longer than a reasonable period before a new ombudsperson is appointed pursuant to this section. If, after six months, the position remains vacant, the director shall provide an update at the next legislative briefing pursuant to Section 4474.17.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 223, Sec. 1.   (SB 471)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4506.3.

The Developmental Services Ombudsperson, in consultation with the department, shall hire the necessary personnel to perform the functions of the office. While all employees within the office shall maintain expertise in the programs described in Section 4506.1, the office shall maintain, at minimum, one person with significant expertise in the Self-Determination Program, as established in Section 4685.8. The ombudsperson shall endeavor to hire individuals with lived experience with the developmental services system, including, but not limited to, individuals with developmental disabilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 223, Sec. 1.   (SB 471)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4506.4.

(a) The Office of the Developmental Services Ombudsperson shall do all of the following:

(1) (A) Disseminate information and provide training and technical assistance to individuals served by a regional center, family members, regional center staff, tribes, advocacy groups, service provider organizations, and other interested parties on the rights of persons with developmental disabilities and services provided by the office. The information shall include methods of contacting the office and notification that conversations with the office may be disclosed to other persons, as necessary, to adequately investigate and resolve a complaint. The
 information and training shall include information about the rights of persons with developmental disabilities under this division, including the rights specified in Chapter 1.3 (commencing with Section 4502) and the Self-Determination Program under Section 4685.8.

(B) Commencing on January 1, 2028, at the end of every two-year legislative session, review amendments to the laws applicable to individuals served by a regional center and recommend to the department any updates to materials published by the department. The department, if workload capacity allows using existing resources, shall update those documents to the best of its ability after receiving recommendations from the ombudsperson.

(2) Receive complaints made by or on behalf of individuals served by a regional
 center related to their care, placement, or services.

(3) Decide, in its discretion, whether to investigate a complaint, or refer complaints to another agency for investigation. After rendering a decision to investigate a complaint, attempt to resolve the complaint without using a judicial or administrative proceeding, including attempting to facilitate solutions to disagreements about eligibility and services.

(4) Upon rendering a decision to investigate a complaint from a complainant, notify the complainant of the intention to investigate. If the office declines to investigate a complaint or continue an investigation, the office shall notify the complainant of the reason for the action of the office.

(5) Update the complainant on the progress of the investigation and the attempts to resolve the complaint, and notify the complainant of the final outcome.

(6) (A) Compile and make available data to the Legislature in their quarterly legislative updates. This data shall include, but is not limited to, the number of contacts to the office, the number of contacts specific to the Self-Determination Program, the number of complaints made and the modality of the submission of those complaints, the number of investigations performed by the office, the trends and issues that arose in the course of resolving complaints, the number of referrals made, and the number of unresolved contacts. The office shall include recommendations consistent with this data for improving the developmental services system.

(B) It is the intent of the Legislature that representatives of the organizations described in subparagraph (B) consider this data in the development of any recommendations offered toward improving the developmental services system.

(C) The deidentified compiled data shall be posted so that it is available to the public on the existing internet website of the office.

(D) Nothing shall preclude the office from issuing data, findings, or reports other than the annual compilation of data described in this paragraph.

(7) Have access to copies of any record of a state agency, local agency, or regional center, and contractors or vendors with the state agency, local
 agencies, and regional centers that is necessary to carry out their responsibilities, and may meet or communicate with an individual served by a regional center in their placement or elsewhere.

(b) The office may present the data compiled under subparagraph (A) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) on an annual basis at appropriate conferences, forums, and other events, as determined by the ombudsperson, that may include presentations to, but are not limited to, representatives of the Legislature, the Association of Regional Center Agencies, the State Council on Developmental Disabilities, tribes, developmental services organizations, advocacy groups, consumer and service provider organizations, and other interested parties.

(c) (1) Information obtained by the
 office from a complaint, regardless of whether it is investigated by the office, referred to another entity for investigation, or determined not to be the proper subject of an investigation, shall remain confidential under relevant state and federal confidentiality laws. Disclosure of information that is not confidential under state and federal confidentiality laws shall occur only as necessary to carry out the mission of the office, including as necessary to provide explanation and support for the office’s recommendations for improving the developmental services system to the Legislature and state and local agencies that provide services and supports to an individual served by a regional center.

(2) The ombudsperson shall maintain confidentiality with respect to the identities of the complainants or witnesses coming before them,
 except insofar as disclosure may be necessary to enable the ombudsperson to carry out the duties of the office set forth in paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a). The ombudsperson may not disclose a record that is confidential under relevant state and federal confidentiality laws, except as authorized by law.

(3) If an individual served by a regional center is represented by a conservator, legal guardian, or counsel, the office may notify the conservator, legal guardian, or counsel of a complaint in order for those entities to satisfy their obligations specified in this division. Notifying these entities of an investigation shall not limit the ombudsperson’s ability to investigate or resolve a complaint or take any other action authorized by this section. If appropriate, the office may also share the outcome of any
 investigation performed by the office with the consumer’s conservator, legal guardian, or counsel.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 223, Sec. 1.   (SB 471)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4506.5.

As part of the office’s efforts to resolve complaints related to the developmental services system, the ombudsperson may do all of the following:

(a) Establish policies and procedures for receiving and processing complaints, conducting investigations, and reporting findings.

(b) Develop and maintain a page on the department’s internet website with information about the office, how to access the office, including via an online portal to submit questions and complaints, general information about this division and regional centers, and links to relevant materials.

(c) Conduct whatever investigation reasonably related to the complaint and to developmental services that the ombudsperson deems necessary, including, but not limited to, both of the following:

(1) Access to, and inspection of, premises within the control of a state agency, local agency, or a regional center, or a contractor or vendor with a state agency, local agency, or regional center, and access to, and inspection of, a licensed or approved residential facility, at any time, with or without prior notice, for the purpose of carrying out the duties of the office. The ombudsperson shall be granted access to records and individuals served by a regional center at all times for the purpose of carrying out the duties of the office.

(A) For purposes of this section,
 “access” means the right to do all of the following:

(i) Enter any licensed or approved developmental services residential facility, upon providing identification. A private home may be entered only with consent of the individual served by a regional center or their legal representative.

(ii) Communicate privately and without restriction with any
 individual served by a regional center, caregiver, staff, personnel, or volunteer.

(iii) Review and copy any record of an individual served by a regional center or caregiver file.

(iv) Observe all resident and staff areas of a facility.

(v) Review and reproduce administrative records, policies, and documents of any licensed or approved developmental services care facility.

(vi) Review and copy all licensing records maintained by the state, county, or agency, and review and reproduce any records of a state, county, or local agency and their contractors, except sealed court records, which may be obtained only by subpoena or other lawful
 court order.

(vii) Interview all relevant witnesses.

(B) For purposes of this section, “record” means a document, paper, memorandum, book, letter, file, drawing, map, plat, photo, photographic file, motion picture, film, microfilm, microphotograph, exhibit, magnetic or paper tape, punched card, or other item developed or received under law or in connection with the transaction of official business, but does not include material that is protected by privilege, unless the holder of the privilege, without coercion, previously disclosed a significant part of the material or consents to disclose the material to the ombudsperson, as provided in Section 912 of the Evidence Code.

(2) Observe proceedings and attend hearings,
 consistent with this division.

(d) Attempt to resolve the complaint.

(e) Submit a written plan to the relevant state agency, local agency, or regional center, or a contractor or vendor with the state agency, local agency, or regional center, recommending a course of action to resolve the complaint. If the ombudsperson makes a written recommendation, the state agency, regional center, or vendor or contractor, shall submit a written response to the ombudsperson within 30 calendar days.

(f) Periodically convene a focus group to advise the office in the performance of its duties described in this chapter. The focus group shall include, but not be limited to, consumers and families across different geographic regions of
 the state, representatives of diverse racial and ethnic backgrounds, ages, and disabilities, and representatives of regional centers, service providers, and advocacy and community-based organizations.

(g) Recommend to the department any changes to laws, regulations, policies, or communications, including, but not limited to, forms and other actions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 223, Sec. 1.   (SB 471)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4506.6.

In order to encourage candor during the ombudsperson’s investigation of complaints made by or on behalf of an individual served by a regional center and to facilitate the ombudsperson’s ability to resolve complaints, all of the following shall apply:

(a) The ombudsperson and staff of the ombudsperson shall not be compelled to testify or be deposed in a judicial or administrative proceeding regarding matters coming to their attention in the exercise of their official duties, except as may be necessary to enforce or implement this chapter.

(b) The records of the ombudsperson and the staff of the ombudsperson, including
 notes, drafts, and records obtained from an individual or agency during the intake, review, or investigation of a complaint, and any reports not released to the public shall not be subject to disclosure or production in response to a subpoena or discovery in a judicial or administrative proceeding, except as necessary to enforce or implement the provisions of this chapter.

(c) When exercising the investigative, complaint resolution, and technical assistance functions of the Office of the Developmental Services Ombudsperson, the ombudsperson and staff of the ombudsperson shall have all immunities under Article 2 (commencing with Section 815) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code afforded to the discharge of discretionary duties by public entities and their employees.

(d) If the ombudsperson believes, based on information received during the exercise of their official duties, that there is a breach of duty or misconduct by an employee of a state agency, local agency, regional center, or their contractors or vendors, in the conduct of the employees’ official duties, the ombudsperson shall refer the matter to the regional center or vendor’s director, or other responsible officer, and if the conduct would constitute a crime, to an appropriate law enforcement body or agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 223, Sec. 1.   (SB 471)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4506.7.

(a) The office shall establish a toll-free number.

(b) Regional center case managers shall provide consumers, and, if appropriate, their parents, legal guardians, conservator, or authorized representative, with the toll-free telephone number for the office and verbal or written information regarding the existence and purpose of the office during the annual individualized program plan or individual family service plan meetings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 223, Sec. 1.   (SB 471)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.6. General Provisions [4507. - 4519.12.]

4507.

Developmental disabilities alone shall not constitute sufficient justification for judicial commitment. Instead, persons with developmental disabilities shall receive services pursuant to this division. Persons who constitute a danger to themselves or others may be judicially committed pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6 if evidence of such danger is proven in court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 25, Sec. 7.   (AB 1472)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4508.

Persons with developmental disabilities may be released from developmental centers for provisional placement, with parental consent in the case of a minor or with the consent of an adult person with developmental disabilities or with the consent of the guardian or conservator of the person with developmental disabilities, not to exceed twelve months, and shall be referred to a regional center for services pursuant to this division. Any person placed pursuant to this section shall have an automatic right of return to the developmental center during the period of
 provisional placement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 414, Sec. 6.   Effective September 22, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4510.

The State Department of Developmental Services, the State Department of Health Care Services, and the State Department of State Hospitals shall jointly develop and implement a statewide program for encouraging the establishment of sufficient numbers and types of living arrangements, both in communities and state hospitals, as necessary to meet the needs of persons served by those departments. The departments shall consult with the following organizations in the development of procedures pursuant to this section:

(a) The League of California Cities, the County Supervisors Association of California, and representatives of other local agencies.

(b) Organizations or advocates for clients receiving services in residential care services.

(c) Providers of residential care services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 438, Sec. 9.   (AB 1468)   Effective September 22, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4511.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that meeting the needs and honoring the choices of persons with developmental disabilities and their families requires information, skills and coordination and collaboration between consumers, families, regional centers, advocates and service and support providers.

(b) The Legislature further finds and declares that innovative and ongoing training opportunities can enhance the information and skills necessary and foster improved coordination
 and cooperation between system participants.

(c) The department shall be responsible, subject to the availability of fiscal and personnel resources, for securing, providing, and coordinating training to assist consumers and their families, regional centers, and services and support providers in acquiring the skills, knowledge, and competencies to achieve the purposes of this division.

(d) This training may include health and safety issues; person-centered planning; consumer and family rights; building circles of support; training and review protocols for the use of psychotropic and other medications; crime prevention; life quality assessment and outcomes; maximizing inclusive opportunities in the community; how to communicate effectively with consumers; and developing opportunities for decisionmaking.

(e) Whenever
 possible, the department shall utilize existing training tools and expertise.

(f) Each training module shall include an evaluation component.

(g) The department shall establish an advisory group, consisting of consumers, family members, regional centers, service providers, advocates and legislative representatives. The advisory group shall make recommendations for training subjects, review the design of training modules, and assess training outcomes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 310, Sec. 31.   Effective August 19, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4511.1.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(1) Supporting service access and equity for persons with developmental disabilities and their families requires awareness, skill development, and training for regional center personnel.

(2) Ongoing implicit bias training enhances service access and equity in the developmental disabilities system.

(b) The department shall require regional centers to implement implicit bias training through its contracts pursuant to Section 4640.6 and shall establish course content and training frequency requirements for that training.

(c) All the regional center personnel shall comply with the implicit bias training requirements of paragraph (9) of subdivision (g) of Section 4640.6 and this section. This section shall additionally apply to regional center contractors involved in intake and assessment and eligibility determinations. The department shall specify the timelines by which training must be completed. Training shall be prioritized for regional center employees and contractors who are involved in eligibility determination or directly assist individuals and their families, or both, during the regional center intake and assessment processes, service coordination, and regional center employees who are involved in developing and implementing purchase of service policies and other policies, guidelines, instructions, or training materials utilized by regional centers when determining the service needs of consumers.

(d) The training described by this section
 may be procured either by the department or by a regional center that has obtained prior approval by the department. Each regional center and its contractors shall retain the training record of employees in their respective personnel files. Regional centers shall annually inform the department of the percentage of its contractors and regional center personnel, identified by job classification, who successfully have completed the training. A list and description of trainings procured by the department, or a regional center with approval by the department, shall be posted on the department’s internet website.

(e) The department or regional center shall make reasonable efforts to procure training that considers all of the following:

(1) Trainers who are representative of the diversity of persons served by regional centers.

(2) Academic training in implicit bias or experience educating public benefit programs about implicit bias and its effects on people accessing and interacting with public benefit programs.

(3) The impact of implicit bias, explicit bias, and systemic bias on public benefit programs and the effect this can have on individuals seeking eligibility for and services through public benefit programs.

(4) Actionable steps trainees can take to recognize and address their own implicit biases.

(f) The training provided by the department and required by this section shall only be implemented subject to an appropriation by the Legislature for those purposes. It is the intent of the Legislature that regional centers continue to implement
 implicit bias training to the extent they are able to, in the absence of a state appropriation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   (AB 143)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4511.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(1) Direct service professionals are critical to the provision of services and supports to individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

(2) In recognition of the value of the services provided by direct service professionals, additional training and development will enhance the services they provide and foster a more sustainable workforce.

(b) (1) With input from stakeholders pursuant to subdivision (c), the department shall develop or utilize
 existing curriculum to implement enhanced direct service professional training that promotes services that are person centered and culturally and linguistically sensitive, and that improve outcomes for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to enhance the quality of services that consumers receive from their direct service professionals, including, but not limited to, improving direct service professional knowledge about general health and safety issues, employing principles of self-determination in order to promote dignity of the recipient and the provider, and working to improve quality of services and quality of life, including advancing health equity for consumers of regional center services.

(3) The training described in paragraph (1) in shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following elements:

(A) Competency based.

(B) Tiered training and certification.

(C) Continuing education.

(D) Outcome measures, as defined by the department, with input from stakeholders pursuant to subdivision (c).

(c) (1) The department shall consult with stakeholders throughout the implementation of this section. This consultation shall include facilitation of a process for providing input and comments on implementation. 

(2) Stakeholders may include, but are not limited to, the following:

(A) Consumers and families across different geographic regions of the state and from diverse racial and ethnic backgrounds, diverse consumer age groups and disabilities.

(B) Regional center representatives.

(C) Service providers representing a diverse range of service types and models.

(d) Implementation of this section is subject to an appropriation of funds for this purpose in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 76, Sec. 19.   (AB 136)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4511.6.

(a) The department shall develop a pilot project to test the feasibility of remote consumer services and supports that use technology solutions.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to test whether remote services and supports could provide an effective option for consumers to lead more independent lives, increase their access to bilingual services, and, when chosen and safe, reduce system reliance on one-to-one in-person direct support.

(c) The department shall pilot remote services and supports as specified in subdivision (d).

(d) In choosing consumers to pilot remote services and supports, the department shall
 consider consumer preference, the type and amount of services or supports and staffing needed to meet the consumer’s individual program plan, and the consumer’s individualized choices and their unique health, safety, and other needs. Consumers chosen for the pilot project shall represent diverse cultural and ethnic backgrounds, ages, and urban and rural regions of the state.

(e) The department shall work with an external entity with relevant program evaluation experience to both design and evaluate the pilot project.

(f) Providers shall be selected to participate in the pilot project by no later than March 1, 2023.

(g) The department shall report to the Legislature at quarterly briefings for legislative staff about the progress of the pilot project. Reporting shall include summaries of the relevant data collected by
 service providers and regional centers.

(h) The department shall submit a final evaluation report of the pilot project to the Legislature, in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, no later than January 10, 2026.

(i) Contracts to procure services to implement this section shall be exempt from the requirements contained in the Public Contract Code and the State Administrative Manual and from approval by the Department of General Services.

(j) Implementation of this section shall be subject to an appropriation by the Legislature for the purpose of this section.

(k) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 14.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4512.

As used in this division:

(a) (1) “Developmental disability” means a disability that originates before an individual attains 18 years of age, continues, or can be expected to continue, indefinitely, and constitutes a substantial disability for that individual. As defined by the Director of Developmental Services, in consultation with the Superintendent of Public Instruction, this term shall include intellectual disability, cerebral palsy, epilepsy, and autism. This term shall also include disabling conditions found to be closely related to intellectual disability or to require treatment similar to that required for individuals with an intellectual disability, but shall not include other handicapping conditions that are solely physical in nature.

(2) (A) A child who is under five years of age shall be provisionally eligible for regional center services if the child has a disability that is not solely physical in nature and has significant functional limitations in at least two of the following areas of major life activity, as determined by a regional center and as appropriate to the age of the child:

(i) Self-care.

(ii) Receptive and expressive language.

(iii) Learning.

(iv) Mobility.

(v) Self-direction.

(B) To be provisionally eligible, a child is not required to have one of the developmental disabilities listed in paragraph (1).

(3) (A) An infant or toddler referred for early intervention services from the regional center pursuant to the California Early Intervention Services Act (Title 14 (commencing with Section 95000) of the Government Code) may be concurrently assessed, if appropriate, to determine whether the infant or toddler is provisionally eligible for regional center services under paragraph (2) or eligible for regional center services under paragraph (1).

(B) If the regional center determines that the infant or toddler qualifies for early intervention services from the regional center pursuant to
 the California Early Intervention Services Act (Title 14 (commencing with Section 95000) of the Government Code) but has not been found to have a developmental disability as defined in paragraph (1) or to be provisionally eligible as defined in paragraph (2), the regional center shall assess the child at least 90 days prior to the date that they turn three years of age for purposes of determining their eligibility for regional center
 services under this section. If the regional center determines the child is not
 eligible, the regional center shall give adequate notice pursuant to Section 4701.

(4) A child who is provisionally eligible pursuant to paragraph (2) shall be reassessed at least 90 days before turning five years of age. The child shall meet the definition set forth in paragraph (1) to continue to be eligible for regional center services at five years of age.

(5) Regional center services for a child who was provisionally eligible pursuant to paragraph (2) and who does not meet the definition in paragraph (1) shall end when the child is five years of age unless an appeal was filed pursuant to Section 4715.

(b) “Services and supports for persons with developmental disabilities” means specialized services and supports or special adaptations of generic services and supports directed toward the
 alleviation of a developmental disability or toward the social, personal, physical, or economic habilitation or rehabilitation of an individual with a developmental disability, or toward the achievement and maintenance of an independent, productive, and normal life. The determination of which services and supports are necessary for each consumer shall be made through the individual program plan process. The determination shall be made on the basis of the needs and preferences of the consumer or, when appropriate, the consumer’s family, and shall include consideration of a range of service options proposed by individual program plan participants, the effectiveness of each option in meeting the goals stated in the individual program plan, and the cost-effectiveness of each option. Services and supports listed in the individual program plan may include, but are not limited to, diagnosis, evaluation, treatment, personal care, daycare, domiciliary care, special living arrangements, physical, occupational, and
 speech therapy, training, education, supported and sheltered employment, mental health services, recreation, counseling of the individual with a developmental disability and of the individual’s family, protective and other social and sociolegal services, information and referral services, follow-along services, adaptive equipment and supplies, advocacy assistance, including self-advocacy training, facilitation and peer advocates, assessment, assistance in locating a home, childcare, behavior training and behavior modification programs, camping, community integration services, community support, daily living skills training, emergency and crisis intervention, facilitating circles of support, habilitation, homemaker services, infant stimulation programs, paid roommates, paid neighbors, respite, short-term out-of-home care, social skills training, specialized medical and dental care, telehealth services and supports, as described in Section 2290.5 of the Business and Professions Code, supported living
 arrangements, technical and financial assistance, travel training, training for parents of children with developmental disabilities, training for parents with developmental disabilities, vouchers, and transportation services necessary to ensure delivery of services to persons with developmental disabilities. This subdivision does not expand or authorize a new or different service or support for any consumer unless that service or support is contained in the consumer’s individual program plan.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), for any organization or agency receiving federal financial participation under the federal Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000, Chapter 144 (commencing with Section 15001) of Title 42 of the United States Code, as amended, “developmental disability” and “services for persons with developmental disabilities” mean the terms as defined in the federal act to the extent required by
 federal law.

(d) “Consumer” means a person who has a disability that meets the definition of developmental disability set forth in subdivision (a).

(e) “Natural supports” means personal associations and relationships typically developed in the community that enhance the quality and security of life for people, including, but not limited to, family relationships, friendships reflecting the diversity of the neighborhood and the community, associations with fellow students or employees in regular classrooms and workplaces, and associations developed through participation in clubs, organizations, and other civic activities.

(f) “Circle of support” means a committed group of community members, who may include family members, meeting regularly with an individual with developmental disabilities in order to share
 experiences, promote autonomy and community involvement, and assist the individual in establishing and maintaining natural supports. A circle of support generally includes a plurality of members who neither provide nor receive services or supports for persons with developmental disabilities and who do not receive payment for participation in the circle of support.

(g) “Facilitation” means the use of modified or adapted materials, special instructions, equipment, or personal assistance by an individual, such as assistance with communications, that will enable a consumer to understand and participate to the maximum extent possible in the decisions and choices that affect the individual’s life.

(h) “Family support services” means services and supports that are provided to a child with developmental disabilities or the child’s family and that contribute to the ability of the family to
 reside together.

(i) “Voucher” means any authorized alternative form of service delivery in which the consumer or family member is provided with a payment, coupon, chit, or other form of authorization that enables the consumer or family member to choose a particular service provider.

(j) “Planning team” means the individual with developmental disabilities, the parents or legally appointed guardian of a minor consumer or the legally appointed conservator of an adult consumer, the authorized representative, including those appointed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4541, one or more regional center representatives, including the designated regional center service coordinator pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4640.7, any individual, including a service provider, invited by the consumer, the parents or legally appointed guardian of a minor consumer or the legally appointed
 conservator of an adult consumer, or the authorized representative, including those appointed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4541, and including a minor’s, dependent’s, or ward’s court-appointed developmental services decisionmaker appointed pursuant to Section 319, 361, or 726.

(k) “Stakeholder organizations” means statewide organizations representing the interests of consumers, family members, service providers, and statewide advocacy organizations.

(l) (1) “Substantial disability” means the existence of significant functional limitations in three or more of the following areas of major life activity, as determined by a regional center, and as appropriate to the age of the person:

(A) Self-care.

(B) Receptive and
 expressive language.

(C) Learning.

(D) Mobility.

(E) Self-direction.

(F) Capacity for independent living.

(G) Economic self-sufficiency.

(2) A reassessment of substantial disability for purposes of continuing eligibility shall utilize the same criteria under which the individual was originally made eligible.

(m) “Native language” means the language normally used or the preferred language identified by the individual and, when appropriate, the individual’s parent, legal guardian or conservator, or authorized representative.

(n) “Authorized representative” means an individual appointed by the State Council on Developmental Disabilities pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4541 or who is an authorized representative, as defined in Section 4701.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 47, Sec. 3.   (AB 162)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4513.

(a) Whenever the department allocates funds to a regional center through a request for proposal process to implement special projects funded through the Budget Act, the department shall require that the regional center demonstrate community support for the proposal.

(b) In awarding funds to regional centers to implement such proposals, the department shall consider, among other indicators, the following:

(1) The
 demonstrated commitment of the regional center in establishing or expanding the service or support.

(2) The demonstrated ability of the regional center to implement the proposal.

(3) The success or failure of previous efforts to establish or expand the service or support.

(4) The need for the establishment or expansion of the service and support in the regional center catchment area as compared to other geographic areas.

(c) The department may require periodic progress reports from the regional center in implementing a proposal.

(d) The department shall ensure that each funded and implemented proposal be evaluated and that the evaluation process include the input of consumers, families,
 providers and advocates, as appropriate.

(e) The department shall make these evaluations available to the public, upon request.

(f) The department shall develop and implement strategies for fostering the duplication of successful projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 310, Sec. 32.   Effective August 19, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4514.

All information and records obtained in the course of providing intake, assessment, and services under Division 4.1 (commencing with Section 4400), Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500), Division 6 (commencing with Section 6000), or Division 7 (commencing with Section 7100) to persons with developmental disabilities shall be confidential. Information and records obtained in the course of providing similar services to either voluntary or involuntary recipients before 1969 shall also be confidential. Information and records shall be disclosed only in any of the following cases:
